Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.050

Certified feed lot license—Fee—Issuance or renewal—Inspection prior to issuance of original license.

(1) The application for an annual license to engage in the business of operating one or more certified feed lots shall be accompanied by a license fee of nine hundred thirty-five dollars.

(2) Upon approval of the application by the director and compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, the applicant shall be issued a license or license renewal. The director shall conduct an inspection of all cattle and their corresponding ownership documents prior to issuing an original license. The inspection fee is the higher of the current inspection fee per head of cattle or time and mileage as set forth in RCW 16.57.220.

[ 2019 c 92 s 7; 2003 c 326 s 49; 1997 c 356 s 5; 1997 c 356 s 4; 1994 c 46 s 23; 1994 c 46 s 14; 1993 c 354 s 3; 1979 c 81 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective dates—1997 c 356: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: See note following RCW 16.65.090.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.